Arkansas, session 2025, SB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 63, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-63-206. Prescription drug harm or homicide.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Executive officer” means a president, chair of an executive
committee, chief financial officer, or other individual with managerial
authority who performs similar functions to a president, chair of an
executive committee, or chief financial officer;
(2)(A) "Pharmaceutical company" means a business that is
registered with the United States Food and Drug Administration to
commercially research, develop, market, manufacture, and distribute
prescription drugs.
(B) "Pharmaceutical company" does not include a licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted healthcare provider or healthcare
facility, such as a pharmacy, hospital, or pharmacist; and
(3) "Uses" means ingests, inhales, injects, or otherwise
introduces into the body.
(b) A person commits prescription drug harm or homicide if:
*JMB108*
03-06-2025 09:48:42 JMB108

As Engrossed: S1/16/25 S3/6/25 SB5
(1) The person is an executive officer for a pharmaceutical
company and is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) The person introduces into the market a prescription drug
produced by the pharmaceutical company;
(3) The person knowingly hides, conceals, omits, or otherwise
withholds evidence, documentation, or information that the prescription drug
has dangerous effects;
(4) Another person is prescribed the prescription drug and in
this state uses the prescription drug; and
(5) The use of the prescription drug causes the death of or
serious physical injury to the other person.
(c) Prescription drug harm or homicide is an unclassified felony with
a sentence of imprisonment of not less than one (1) year and not more than
life.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1287. Prescription Drug Harm or Homicide Offense Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Prescription Drug Harm or Homicide Offense Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Federal funds received through a grant;
(2) Appropriations from the General Assembly; and
(3) Other revenues and funds authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used to provide funding and support for the
prosecution of the offense of prescription drug harm or homicide under § 5-
63-206.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Expiration date.
(a) This act expires on December 31, 2026.
(b) On or after December 31, 2026, the Bureau of Legislative Research
or the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may remove from the Arkansas Code
the sections created in Sections 1 and 2 of this act.
(c) Any funds in the Prescription Drug Harm or Homicide Offense Fund
on December 31, 2026, shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund
03-06-2025 09:48:42 JMB108

As Engrossed: S1/16/25 S3/6/25 SB5
Account.

/s/B. King

































03-06-2025 09:48:42 JMB108